District of Columbia statutes.
25-124

Wine pub permit requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A wine pub permit shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine at one location from grapes or fruit transported from an area that produces wine to the licensed restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub for on-premises consumption and for sale to licensed wholesalers for the purpose of resale to other licensees.

(b)

A wine pub permit shall be issued only to the licensee under an on-premises restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub license, class C or D, in conjunction with the issuance of an on-premises restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub license, class C or D.

(c)

The location used to manufacture wine shall be on or immediately adjacent to the restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub licensed to the wine pub owner in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

The holder of a wine pub permit may also sell wine to patrons in sealed bottles or other closed containers for off-premises consumption.

(e)

The minimum annual fee of the wine pub permit shall be $5,000.

(f)

A wine pub permit shall be cancelled or revoked if:

(1)

The restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub ceases to be operated as a restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub; or

(2)

The licensee’s on-premises retailer’s license, class C or D, is revoked or cancelled.

(g)

A wine pub permit shall be automatically suspended whenever and for the same period that the licensee’s retailer’s license, class C or D, is suspended.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(g), 60 DCR 3410
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(g) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).